New York, session 2025-2026, S3716.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. The utilization of multi-disciplinary 2 teams (MDTs) can be extremely valuable in the implementation of certain 3 programs, particularly those which are likely to have a widespread 4 impact and affect several professions, as is the case with most systems 5 of mandatory reporting. MDTs make use of the experience, expertise, and 6 perspectives which may be unique to individuals involved in one of the 7 affected professions. Before a program is implemented which may have a 8 broad impact, MDTs can be a valuable resource in developing an effective 9 strategy that minimizes unintended negative consequences. In many 10 instances, it is appropriate for a government entity to establish an MDT 11 with which the entity may collaborate with and seek input from regarding 12 the specifics of a planned project. 13 Beyond the general usefulness of MDTs, where a proposed program which 14 will affect the members of many professions is to be created by statute, 15 it is often recommended to also include language providing for the 16 establishment of MDT to provide input on any specifics not contained in 17 the statute. This inclusion ensures that the involved professions have a 18 chance to be heard before a program is implemented in a way which might 19 adversely affect the members of such professions or the individuals 20 served by the professions. 21 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 501-i to 22 read as follows: 23 § 501-i. Multi-disciplinary team demonstration program. The office of 24 children and family services is hereby authorized, in conjunction with 25 the office for the aging, to establish a multi-disciplinary team demon- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05585-01-5 S. 3716 2 1 stration program, subject to appropriation of funds for the program, to 2 establish multi-disciplinary teams at the county level for complex cases 3 of adult abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation. Such multi-discipli- 4 nary teams will be comprised of professionals across disciplines that 5 provide professional knowledge and expertise of their respective profes- 6 sional disciplines, as well as a full-time, skilled and experienced 7 multi-disciplinary team coordinator for each demonstration location. The 8 multi-disciplinary team coordinator will provide case consultation, 9 triage cases, facilitate county-level multi-disciplinary team meetings, 10 monitor progress, and facilitate coordination and cooperative action in 11 the provision of appropriate services to an individual identified as 12 being a victim of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation, as well as 13 other duties associated with the role. Such multi-disciplinary teams 14 shall consist of representation by professionals generally authorized to 15 make decisions on behalf of their agency from selected public, private, 16 and voluntary agencies including but not limited to health/medical, 17 mental health, aging, protective services, human services, social work, 18 banking/financial institutions, legal services, and law enforcement 19 agencies, and include specialty services such as forensic accounting, 20 geriatrics, and psychiatry/geropsychiatry, on a fee-for-service basis. A 21 secure database use by the multi-disciplinary team coordinator for 22 intake, tracking, and outcomes of such cases will be established and 23 used as part of the demonstration program. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.